Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202214-806
Claims; time limit for allowing; payment prohibited, when.

No bill or claim for labor, salary, or material, or for extra service or overtime or account of any kind against a city of the metropolitan class, after such bill or claim has been adversely reported on and rejected by the city, and no bill, account, or claim, not presented or claimed within eighteen months after such bill, account, or claim was incurred and payable, shall be allowed or authorized to be paid by the mayor and city council except through the judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction. These provisions shall apply equally to any modification of the same account in whatever form such account may be presented.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. VII, § 6, p. 510;

C.S.1922, § 3714;

C.S.1929, § 14-806;

R.S.1943, § 14-806;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 227.
July 21, 2022
This section operates as a statute of limitations for wage claims against a city of the metropolitan class. Under this section, an administration may pay a timely wage claim rejected by a prior administration if ordered to do so by a court. Thompson v. City of Omaha, 235 Neb. 346, 455 N.W.2d 538 (1990).

This section is a limitation upon the power and jurisdiction of the council itself. Redell v. City of Omaha, 80 Neb. 178, 113 N.W. 1054 (1907).